tests/mz-cases.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../kum.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../kum.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "[twol] Words where ь triggers front harmony but is deleted ":
    ансамбль<n><dat> : ансамблге
    ансамбль<n><px3sp><nom> : ансамбли
    ансамбль<n><pl><nom> : ансамбллер
    спектакль<n><nom> : спектакль
    спектакль<n><pl><nom> : спектакллер
    спектакль<n><px3sp><nom> : спектакли
    спектакль<n><dat> : спектаклге

  "[twol] Months where ь triggers front harmony but is deleted ":
    декабрь<n><dat> : декабрге
    декабрь<n><loc> : декабрде
    декабрь<n><acc> : декабрни
    декабрь<n><px3sp><nom> : декабри
    декабрь<n><px3sp><dat> : декабрине
    сентябрь<n><dat> : сентябрге
    сентябрь<n><loc> : сентябрде
    сентябрь<n><acc> : сентябрни
    сентябрь<n><px3sp><nom> : сентябри
    октябрь<n><dat> : октябрге
    октябрь<n><loc> : октябрде
    октябрь<n><acc> : октябрни
    октябрь<n><px3sp><nom> : октябри
    ноябрь<n><dat> : ноябрге
    ноябрь<n><loc> : ноябрде
    ноябрь<n><acc> : ноябрни
    ноябрь<n><px3sp><nom> : ноябри

  "[twol] Months where ь is deleted, no front harmony":
    январь<n><loc> : январьда
    январь<n><acc> : январьны
    январь<n><px3sp><nom> : январы
    февраль<n><loc> : февральда
    февраль<n><acc> : февральны
    февраль<n><px3sp><nom> : февралы
    июль<n><loc> : июльда
    июль<n><acc> : июльну
    июнь<n><loc> : июнда
    июнь<n><acc> : июнну
    июнь<n><px3sp><nom> : июну

  "[twol] Months where ь is deleted, already front":
    апрель<n><loc> : апрелде
    апрель<n><acc> : апрелни
    апрель<n><px3sp><nom> : апрели
    Сибирь<np><top><nom> : Сибирь
    Сибирь<np><top><dat> : Сибирге
    Сибирь<np><top><abl> : Сибирден
    Сибирь<np><top><loc> : Сибирде

  "[twol] Words where orthographic ь doesn't affect harmony":
    аллагь<n><nom> : аллагь
    аллагь<n><loc> : аллагьда
    аллагь<n><dat> : аллагьгъа
    аллагь<n><px3sp><nom> : аллагьы
    аллагь<n><gen> : аллагьны
    ругь<n><nom> : ругь
    ругь<n><loc> : ругьда
    ругь<n><dat> : ругьгъа
    ругь<n><px3sp><nom> : ругьу
    ругь<n><gen> : ругьну
    фестиваль<n><dat> : фестивальгъа
    фестиваль<n><abl> : фестивальдан
    фестиваль<n><loc> : фестивальда
    фестиваль<n><acc> : фестивальны
    фестиваль<n><pl><nom> : фестиваллар
    фестиваль<n><px3sp><gen> : фестивалыны
